New York, session 2025-2026, S1434.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 190.24 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 190.24 Stolen valor. 4 A person commits the crime of stolen valor if such person knowingly, 5 with the intent to obtain money, property or another tangible benefit: 6 1. misrepresents themself as a member or veteran of the United States 7 Armed Forces or organized militia by wearing the uniform or any medal or 8 insignia authorized for use by the members or veterans of the United 9 States Armed Forces or the organized militia, by federal and state laws 10 and regulations, or 11 2. holds themself out to be a recipient of any decoration or medal 12 created by federal and state laws and regulations to honor the members 13 or veterans of the United States Armed Forces or the organized militia. 14 The crime of stolen valor is a class A misdemeanor. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04473-01-5